Florida, session 2026, SB148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âPresent subsections (7) through (12) of section 19 458.3475, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8) 20 through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (7) is added to 21 that section, to read: 22 458.3475âAnesthesiologist assistants.â 23 (7)âTEMPORARY LICENSURE.â 24 (a)âThe department shall issue a temporary license to 25 practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant who 26 meets all of the following criteria: 27 1.âHas graduated from an approved anesthesiologist 28 assistant program. 29 2.âHas applied for and is awaiting results of the 30 certification examination administered by the National 31 Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants. 32 3.âHas submitted a completed application for licensure and 33 paid all applicable fees. 34 4.âHas not committed any act or offense that would 35 constitute grounds for denial of licensure under this chapter. 36 5.âHas submitted to a background screening pursuant to s. 37 456.0135. 38 (b)âA temporary license issued under this subsection: 39 1.âIs valid for a period not to exceed 180 days after the 40 date of issuance. 41 2.âIs nonrenewable. 42 3.âAutomatically expires upon the applicantâs passage of 43 the certification examination and issuance of a full license, or 44 upon the applicantâs failure of the certification examination. 45 (c)âA temporary licensee may practice only under the direct 46 supervision of a licensed anesthesiologist who has filed a 47 written protocol with the department in accordance with 48 subsection (2). 49 (d)âThe boards shall adopt rules to implement this 50 subsection, including application procedures and supervision 51 requirements. 52 Section 2.âPresent subsections (7) through (12) of section 53 459.023, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8) 54 through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (7) is added to 55 that section, to read: 56 459.023âAnesthesiologist assistants.â 57 (7)âTEMPORARY LICENSURE.â 58 (a)âThe department shall issue a temporary license to 59 practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant who 60 meets all of the following criteria: 61 1.âHas graduated from an approved anesthesiologist 62 assistant program. 63 2.âHas applied for and is awaiting results of the 64 certification examination administered by the National 65 Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants. 66 3.âHas submitted a completed application for licensure and 67 paid all applicable fees. 68 4.âHas not committed any act or offense that would 69 constitute grounds for denial of licensure under this chapter. 70 5.âHas submitted to a background screening pursuant to s. 71 456.0135. 72 (b)âA temporary license issued under this subsection: 73 1.âIs valid for a period not to exceed 180 days after the 74 date of issuance. 75 2.âIs nonrenewable. 76 3.âAutomatically expires upon the applicantâs passage of 77 the certification examination and issuance of a full license, or 78 upon the applicantâs failure of the certification examination. 79 (c)âA temporary licensee may practice only under the direct 80 supervision of a licensed anesthesiologist who has filed a 81 written protocol with the department in accordance with 82 subsection (2). 83 (d)âThe boards shall adopt rules to implement this 84 subsection, including application procedures and supervision 85 requirements. 86 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.